Utah statutes.
38-1b-203.   Notice of intent to obtain final completion and notice of completion.

Sections 38-1a-506 and 38-1a-507 apply to a government project to the same extent as those sections apply to a construction project that is subject to Chapter 1a, Preconstruction and Construction Liens.

